Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 11 VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTER PENSION ACT
31-30-1122. Retirement pension.

The board of a municipality, with the prior consent of the municipality's governing body, or the board of a fire protection district or county improvement district may pay a retirement pension to a volunteer firefighter who has twenty years of active service and who is over the age of fifty years. The retirement pension shall be an amount determined by the board of not more than one hundred dollars per month, unless an actuarial review indicates a higher payment is actuarially sound; except that any such amount determined by the board of a municipality shall be made with the prior consent of the municipality's governing body. Pensions that make payments in excess of three hundred dollars per month are subject to the state contribution limitation specified in section 31-30-1112 (2)(b). Except as provided in section 31-30-1132, a volunteer firefighter shall not receive a retirement pension for service in a fire department while the firefighter is an active member of that department. A volunteer firefighter shall maintain a minimum training participation in the fire department of thirty-six hours each year to qualify for retirement benefits. A volunteer firefighter who has served twenty years and who has not reached the age of fifty years may be granted a leave of absence and retain all rights to a retirement pension and is entitled to the retirement pension when the firefighter is fifty years of age.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the board may pay a retirement pension to a volunteer firefighter who has less than twenty years of active service if the municipality's or district's fund is actuarially sound. The board shall determine the period of active service necessary to qualify for this retirement pension, but in no event shall such period be less than ten years of active service. The board shall not pay this retirement pension until the volunteer firefighter is fifty years of age. The amount of this retirement pension shall be determined by prorating the amount of the retirement pension under subsection (1) of this section based on the volunteer firefighter's years of service.

Whenever the board increases the retirement pension benefit payable pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, such increase may also be applied to the pension benefit of any retired volunteer firefighter receiving the pension benefit specified in subsection (1) of this section at the time of such increase. The applicable pro rata share of any such increase, based upon the number of years of service, may also be applied to the pension benefit of any retired volunteer firefighter receiving the pension benefit specified in subsection (2) of this section at the time of such increase. Whenever the board elects to apply any retirement pension increase permitted under this subsection (3), the board shall apply such increase to the retirement pension of all retired volunteer firefighters in a fire department who are eligible for such increase under this subsection (3). Any actuarial review required under subsection (1) of this section shall include the cost of any retirement pension increase permitted under this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1374, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 169, § 2, effective March 28; (3) added, p. 968, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 98:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 64, § 2, effective March 23; (1) amended, p. 808, § 3, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 98-1035 and House Bill 98-1380 were harmonized.

31-30-1123. Retirement pension - sources of payment.

The retirement pension of a volunteer firefighter who has earned twenty years of active service as a volunteer firefighter for any one municipality or district shall be paid from the fund of that municipality or district, and no other fund shall pay a pension to that volunteer firefighter. The retirement pension of a volunteer firefighter who earns twenty years of active service as a volunteer firefighter after June 2, 1977, by serving more than one municipality or district shall be paid from the fund of each municipality or district for which the volunteer firefighter served at least five years. The amount paid by each fund for each year of service with the particular municipality or district shall equal one-twentieth of the retirement pension being paid by that fund on the day the volunteer firefighter left the service of the particular municipality or district. The retirement pension of a volunteer firefighter who earns twenty years of active service as a volunteer firefighter by serving more than one municipality or district shall be paid only by the municipality or district last served by that volunteer firefighter if any part of the twenty years of service was earned on or before June 2, 1977. In no event shall a volunteer firefighter receive a total retirement benefit from all volunteer firefighter pension funds exceeding the maximum amount paid by the board from such funds pursuant to section 31-30-1122 (1) or four hundred fifty dollars, whichever is greater.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1375, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 808, § 4, effective May 26.

31-30-1124. Compliance - insufficient moneys.

The board may require information, including proof of years of service, and establish procedures as it deems necessary to ensure compliance with the requirements and limitations of sections 31-30-1122 and 31-30-1123.

If at any time money or other property in the fund is insufficient to pay the full amount per month to which each volunteer firefighter receiving a pension under this part 11 and other beneficiary of the fund is entitled, an equal percentage of the monthly payment shall be made to those volunteer firefighters and other beneficiaries until the fund is replenished in an amount that permits payment in full to those volunteer firefighters and other beneficiaries.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1375, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1125. Supplemental retirement pension.

In addition to the monthly retirement pension provided by section 31-30-1122, the board of a municipality, with the prior consent of the municipality's governing body, or the board of a fire protection district or county improvement district may pay a supplemental monthly retirement pension to a volunteer firefighter who is fifty years of age and who has been in active service more than twenty years if:

An actuarial review indicates a supplemental monthly pension payment is actuarially sound; and

Sixty-five percent of the total number of fire department members and retired fire department members give prior approval.

The supplemental monthly pension payment shall not exceed five percent of the monthly pension payment provided by section 31-30-1122 multiplied by the number of years of active service in excess of twenty years, up to a maximum of ten years; except that the total of the monthly retirement pension payment provided by section 31-30-1122 and the supplemental monthly pension payment shall not exceed an amount that is actuarially sound.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1376, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 65, § 3, effective March 23.

31-30-1126. Survivor benefit.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, upon the death of a retired fire department member or a volunteer firefighter who, regardless of age, has served the requisite number of years for retirement under section 31-30-1122 and who leaves a surviving spouse, the board may pay an annuity of not more than fifty percent of the current pension payment for a retired fire department member if the fund is actuarially sound. If the volunteer firefighter had less than twenty years of active service, the annuity to the surviving spouse shall be prorated based upon the number of years of service.

This annuity to the surviving spouse shall cease if the surviving spouse remarries. Dissolution of a subsequent marriage does not reinstate the annuity. A surviving spouse shall not receive both an annuity under section 31-30-1127 and an annuity under this section.

The benefits under this section do not apply if the optional survivor benefits under section 31-30-1128 are provided.

The benefits under this section may be increased in the same manner as postretirement benefit increases as provided in section 31-30-1122 (3), subject to the state contribution limit set forth in section 31-30-1112 (2).

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1376, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(4) added, p. 809, § 5, effective May 26.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 506, § 2, effective July 1.

31-30-1127. Survivor benefit - death from injuries in the line of duty.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, if a fire department member dies from injuries received while in the line of duty as a volunteer firefighter and leaves a surviving spouse, the board shall pay the surviving spouse a monthly annuity either in an amount the board deems proper and necessary, but not more than one-half the amount paid by the board pursuant to section 31-30-1122 (1) or two hundred twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater, or within limits prescribed by municipal ordinance or by rules of the board of the affected municipality or district. The annuity shall cease if the surviving spouse remarries. Dissolution of a subsequent marriage does not reinstate the annuity.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, if there is no surviving spouse as provided in subsection (1) of this section but there is a surviving child of the deceased volunteer firefighter under eighteen years of age, the board shall pay a monthly annuity either in an amount the board deems proper or necessary, but not more than one-half the amount paid by the board pursuant to section 31-30-1122 (1) or two hundred twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater, or within limits prescribed by municipal ordinance or by rules of the board of the affected municipality or district. The board shall pay this annuity to the guardian of the child on behalf of the child. The annuity shall cease when the child is eighteen years of age.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, if there is no surviving spouse or child as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section but there is a surviving dependent parent of the deceased volunteer firefighter, the board shall pay the dependent parent a monthly annuity either in an amount the board deems proper and necessary, but not more than one-half the amount paid by the board pursuant to section 31-30-1122 (1) or two hundred twenty-five dollars, whichever is greater, or within limits prescribed by municipal ordinance or by rules of the board of the affected municipality or district. The annuity shall cease if the dependent parent remarries. Dissolution of a subsequent marriage does not reinstate the annuity.

The benefits under this section:

Are in addition to the educational benefits under section 23-3.3-205, C.R.S.;

Do not apply if the optional survivor benefits under section 31-30-1128 are provided; and

May be increased in the same manner as postretirement benefit increases as provided in section 31-30-1122 (3), subject to the state contribution limit set forth in section 31-30-1112 (2).

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1377, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 809, § 6, effective May 26.

L. 2002:

(4)(c) amended, p. 506, § 3, effective July 1.

31-30-1128. Optional survivor benefits.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 31-30-1126 and 31-30-1127 relating to payment of annuities in the event of the death of a volunteer firefighter in active service, the board in any municipality, with the prior consent of the governing body of such municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district having a volunteer fire department may provide to the active members of the volunteer fire department the option of having the survivor benefits offered by this section in lieu of the purchase of individual, group, or blanket life, endowment, or annuity or variable annuity insurance pursuant to section 31-30-1114 (1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II) and in lieu of the survivor benefits provided to active volunteer firefighters pursuant to sections 31-30-1126 and 31-30-1127 if the following conditions are met:

Sixty-five percent of the active and retired volunteer firefighters of the affected volunteer fire department consent in writing to the option provided by this section;

An actuarial review by an independent actuary indicates the option provided by this section is actuarially sound and will not impair the ability of pension funds to pay the annuities to a beneficiary or to pay pensions; and

If a municipality intends to provide the option provided by this section, the governing body of the municipality consents to the option.

The governing body of a municipality or the board of a fire protection district or county improvement district having a volunteer fire department that intends to provide the option provided by this section shall determine whether the survivor benefits are allowed only if the volunteer firefighter dies while on duty and shall determine the benefit amount equal to up to one hundred percent of the amount of the pension the volunteer firefighter would have been entitled to under this part 11 if the volunteer firefighter had retired immediately before the volunteer firefighter's death. If survivor benefits are provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the members of a volunteer fire department and if a volunteer firefighter who is a member of such fire department dies on duty or, if authorized by the governing body or board, off duty, a spouse, dependent child, or dependent parent of the volunteer firefighter or, lacking such dependents, any other beneficiary who is a natural person and who has been designated by the volunteer firefighter shall receive a monthly annuity in the amount determined pursuant to this subsection (2).

If survivor benefits are provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the board shall pay the annuity authorized by this section to the designated beneficiary or to the legal guardian of the designated beneficiary who is a child under the age of eighteen as follows:

Until the death of the beneficiary;

If the beneficiary is a child under the age of eighteen, until the death of the child or until the child is eighteen years of age;

If the beneficiary is a full-time student in an educational or vocational institution, until the beneficiary is twenty-three years of age;

If the beneficiary is the surviving spouse, until the surviving spouse remarries; or

Until the proceeds of the insurance policies provided in subsection (4) of this section and the accrued interest on such insurance proceeds are exhausted.

To pay the costs of the option provided pursuant to this section, the board shall insure members of the volunteer fire department by insurance policies of individual, group, or blanket life, endowment, or annuity insurance or variable annuity insurance. The pension fund must be the beneficiary of these insurance policies, and the proceeds of these insurance policies shall be paid to the board as an addition to the fund. Payment of the premiums on these policies shall be paid from the existing pension fund assets, from additional local contributions made to the existing pension fund for payment of the premiums, or both; except that, notwithstanding the provisions of section 31-30-1112 concerning the amount of state contributions to the pension fund, additional state contributions shall not be made to the existing pension fund assets for payment of the premiums on these policies or as a result of additional local contributions made to the existing pension fund for payment of the premiums.

If survivor benefits are provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and if a volunteer firefighter terminates active duty before retirement, the board may allow the firefighter to purchase any insurance policy that was purchased pursuant to subsection (4) of this section at a price equal to the cash value of the policy. If the firefighter does not purchase the policy, the board shall surrender the policy for its cash value. Moneys obtained by the board pursuant to this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the pension fund and used to pay the costs of the survivor benefits provided pursuant to this section.

The survivor benefits provided pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be terminated at any time by either:

A vote to terminate by the governing body of the municipality or the board of the fire protection district or county improvement district having a volunteer fire department;

A vote to terminate approved by sixty-five percent of the members of the volunteer fire department.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1377, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1129. Funeral benefit.

When an active volunteer firefighter or retired fire department member dies, the board shall pay a funeral benefit to assist in the proper burial of the deceased firefighter in an amount determined by the board of not more than twice the amount determined by the board under section 31-30-1122, but not less than one hundred dollars. The board shall pay this funeral benefit to any person who pays the necessary funeral expenses.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1379, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 810, § 7, effective May 26.

31-30-1130. Fire department dissolution.

If a fire department dissolves and the services of volunteer firefighters or the fire department are discontinued:

The benefits paid under this part 11 to volunteer firefighters or their surviving spouses, dependent parents, children, and other beneficiaries at the time of the dissolution shall continue;

Assets of the fund shall be transferred with other assets of the fire department and shall be administered by the board of trustees of the successor pension fund;

In no event shall the rate of compensation be altered either after commencement of proceedings for dissolution has occurred or after its completion;

A volunteer firefighter who has accrued ten or more years of active service at the time of the dissolution shall be granted an annuity after the firefighter is fifty years of age. The annuity shall be prorated in accordance with the number of years of service and the amount of annuity being paid for age and service pensions by the board at the time of the dissolution.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1380, § 2, effective June 5.

31-30-1131. Volunteer firefighter - employment termination restricted.

An employer shall not terminate an employee who is a volunteer firefighter and who fails to report to work because the employee has responded to an emergency summons if the employee provides the employer with a written statement from the chief of the fire department that the employee's absence was due to the response.

(1.5) An employer shall not terminate an employee who is a volunteer firefighter and who leaves work to respond to an emergency summons, if:

The employer does not deem the employee to be essential to the operation of the employer's daily enterprise;

The employer has previously received written documentation from the fire chief of the employee's fire department notifying the employer of the employee's status as a volunteer firefighter;

The emergency is within the response area of the employee's fire department and is of such magnitude that the emergency summons issued by the fire chief requires all firefighters to respond; and

The chief of the employee's fire department provides the employer with a written statement verifying the time, date, and duration of the employee's response.

An employer may deduct time lost from employment caused by a response to an emergency summons from the wages of an employee who is a volunteer firefighter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if a volunteer firefighter is called to an emergency pursuant to part 8 of article 33.5 of title 24, C.R.S., the provisions of section 24-33.5-825 or 24-33.5-826, C.R.S., shall control regarding the volunteer firefighters absence or leave from work. Under no circumstances shall a volunteer firefighter's leave exceed the amount allowed pursuant to section 24-33.5-825 or 24-33.5-826, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 1380, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 339, § 2, effective April 8.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1695, § 100, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 109, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

31-30-1132. Retired firefighter - return to active service - benefits.

If the governing body of any municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, by resolution, determines that a fire department is in need of additional volunteer firefighters, a retired fire department member shall be eligible to serve as an active volunteer firefighter of such fire department. Any retired fire department member who, subsequent to retirement, serves as an active volunteer firefighter for a fire department pursuant to this section shall continue to receive pension benefits from the volunteer firefighter pension fund under this article during the period in which the person is an active volunteer firefighter of the fire department. During the period such person is receiving a pension and acting as an active volunteer firefighter pursuant to this section, such person shall not receive service credit for the purpose of increasing such pension.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 169, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 776, § 62, effective June 1.

31-30-1133. Qualification requirements - internal revenue code - definitions.

As used in this section, "internal revenue code" means the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

Any volunteer firefighter pension plan established by this part 11 to provide retirement benefits for volunteer firefighters shall satisfy the qualification requirements specified in section 401 of the internal revenue code, as applicable to governmental plans. In order to meet those requirements, such plans are subject to the following provisions, notwithstanding any other provision of this part 11:

The board shall distribute the corpus and income of the pension plan to members and their beneficiaries in accordance with this part 11 and the rules adopted by the board.

No part of the corpus or income of the pension plan may be used for or diverted to any purpose other than that of providing benefits to participants and their beneficiaries and defraying reasonable expenses of administering the pension plan, except for an assignment for child support debt pursuant to section 14-14-104, C.R.S., child support arrearages as requested as part of an enforcement action under article 5 of title 14, C.R.S., or child support arrearages that are the subject of enforcement services provided under section 26-13-106, C.R.S., and except for income assignments for child support purposes pursuant to section 14-14-111.5, C.R.S., and a writ of garnishment that is the result of a judgment taken for arrearages for child support or for child support debt.

A board may adopt any provision for a plan that is necessary to comply with the internal revenue code.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 22, § 1, effective March 16.

L. 2006:

(2)(b) amended, p. 179, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1030), ch. 16, p. 87, § 1, effective August 5.

31-30-1134. Statewide accidental death and disability insurance policy - department of local affairs.

Beginning on July 1, 2004, the department of local affairs shall provide for and determine the cost of a statewide accidental death and disability insurance policy to cover all volunteer firefighters serving in volunteer or paid and volunteer fire departments, the insurance to be applicable only when serving as a volunteer firefighter. The policy shall be paid for as provided in section 31-30-1112 (2)(h)(II) from the proceeds of the tax imposed by section 10-3-209, C.R.S.

The department of local affairs shall set the amount of coverage to be provided for each volunteer firefighter, take competitive bids for the policy from insurers, and make such rules as may be necessary to provide for the policy.

The department of local affairs shall secure an accidental death and disability insurance policy that offers the best benefits available for the amount of moneys transferred to the department pursuant to section 31-30-1112 (2)(h)(II).

The insurer shall have sole power to determine disability for volunteer firefighters under the policy provided by this section.

The department of local affairs shall have the authority to contract with any entity for the purpose of complying with the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1136, § 3, effective July 1.